Utah statutes.
17C-1-502.   Sources from which bonds may be made payable -- Agency powers regarding bonds.

(1)  The principal and interest on bonds issued by an agency may be made payable from:

(a)  the income and revenues of the projects financed with the proceeds of the bonds;

(b)  the income and revenues of certain designated projects whether or not they were financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds;

(c)  the income, proceeds, revenues, property, and funds of the agency derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out urban renewal, economic development, or community development;

(d)  tax increment funds;

(e)  agency revenues generally;

(f)  a contribution, loan, grant, or other financial assistance from the federal government or a public entity in aid  of urban renewal, economic development, or community development; or

(g)  funds derived from any combination of the methods listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (f).

(2)  In connection with the issuance of agency bonds, an agency may:

(a)  pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence;

(b)  encumber by mortgage, deed of trust, or otherwise all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired; and

(c)  make the covenants and take the action that may be necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure its bonds, or, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, that will tend to make the bonds more marketable, even though such covenants or actions are not specifically enumerated in this chapter.

